District of Columbia statutes.
42-3405.04

Notice of rejection.

If the Mayor determines to reject an application by a party pursuant to this chapter, he or she shall notify the applicant of the findings upon which the rejection is based, and that the rejection will be deemed final in 20 days. During the 20-day period, the applicant may petition for reconsideration, and, upon a proper showing of reasonable grounds, shall be entitled to a hearing to contest the particulars specified in the Mayor’s rejection notice. Such notice of rejection shall not take effect during the pendency of a hearing, if requested.

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 504, 27 DCR 2975
Aug. 1, 1981, D.C. Law 4-27, § 2(g), 28 DCR 2824

History

This section is referenced in § 42-3405.08.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 45-1654.

Prior Codifications

Reenactment of Law 3-86: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3401.01.

Editor's Notes